Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 12
STATEWIDE COMMUNICATIONS INTEROPERABILITY

Sec.

§ 46-1201. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1202. Idaho statewide interoperability executive council. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1203. Purpose. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1204. Council responsibilities. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1205. Rules. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1206. Idaho statewide interoperability executive council communications fund

Establishment and administration. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1207. Administrative support. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1208. Meetings. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1209. Chair and vice-chair. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1210. Subcommittees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1211. Council members. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.

§ 46-1212. Council member terms. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 11, effective July 1, 2016. For interoperable and emergency communications, see§ 31-4801 et seq.